Utah statutes.
58-49-4.   Qualifications for certification -- Fee.

Each applicant for certification under this chapter shall provide proof satisfactory to the division that the applicant:

(1)  is of good moral character as it relates to the practice of dietetics;

(2)  holds a baccalaureate or post-baccalaureate degree conferred by a college or university approved by the division at the time the degree was conferred with a major course of study in the sciences of food, dietetics, food systems management, or an equivalent major course of study;

(3)  has completed an internship or preplanned professional baccalaureate or post-baccalaureate experience in a dietetic program under the supervision of a certified dietitian who is certified under this chapter or certified, registered, or licensed under the laws of another state or territory of the United States;

(4)  has satisfactorily passed a competency examination, approved by or given at the direction of the board in collaboration with the division; and

(5)  has paid the appropriate fees determined by the Department of Commerce.  The fee assessed by the Department of Commerce shall be fair and reasonable and shall reflect the cost of services provided.



Amended by Chapter 225, 1989 General Session

